Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.130

Cooperative watershed management.

In addition to the authority provided in RCW 36.89.030, a county may, as part of maintaining a system of stormwater control facilities, participate in and expend revenue on cooperative watershed management actions, including watershed management partnerships under RCW 39.34.210 and other intergovernmental agreements, for purposes of water supply, water quality, and water resource and habitat protection and management.

[ 2003 c 327 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2003 c 327: See note following RCW 39.34.190.